Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [473.687] PARKING FEES WAIVED FOR DISABLED VETERANS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "veteran with a total service-connected disability" means a veteran as defined in section 197.447 who has a permanent and total service-connected disability as certified by the United States Veterans Administration. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Parking fees waived for disabled veterans. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, a veteran with a total service-connected disability may park free of charge for up to ten consecutive or nonconsecutive days during a 90-day period at all parking facilities at the Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport. A veteran with a total service-connected disability must be charged the standard rate for parking for any additional days of parking during the 90-day period. new text end new text begin (b) On or before December 1, 2026, the commission must establish a process to waive or abate fees incurred by a veteran with a total service-connected disability at all parking facilities at the Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport. The commission must conduct outreach with veterans organizations statewide on the process and must post the process on the Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport website. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Documentation required. new text end new text begin To qualify for the parking fee waiver or abatement under this section, a veteran with a total service-connected disability must provide one of the following forms of documentation at the time and in the form and manner consistent with the process established by the commission under subdivision 2: new text end new text begin (1) a driver's license with a graphic or written designation of "Veteran 100% T&P" under section 171.07, subdivision 15; new text end new text begin (2) a military identification card issued by the United States Department of Defense indicating a 100 percent disability rating; or new text end new text begin (3) a letter from the United States Department of Veteran Affairs confirming the veteran's 100 percent disability rating. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end